South Carolina, session 2025-2026, H3830.
Be it enacted by the General Assembly of the State of South Carolina: SECTION 1.A.  Section 20-4-20(b) of the S.C. Code is amended to read: (b) "Household member" means: (i) a spouse; (ii) a former spouse; (iii) persons who have a child in common; (iv) a male and female who are cohabiting or formerly have cohabited; or (v) persons who are presently or were recently in a dating relationship together. B. Section 20-4-20 of the S.C. Code is amended by adding: (g)(i) "Dating relationship" means a romantic, courtship, or engagement relationship between two individuals that need not include sexual involvement. In addition to any other factors the court deems relevant, the court may consider the following factors in making a determination of whether a relationship exists or existed: (A) the length of the relationship; (B) the nature or type of the relationship; (C) the frequency of interaction between the two individuals involved in the relationship; and (D) the time since termination of the relationship, if applicable. (ii) "Dating relationship" does not include a casual relationship or ordinary fraternization between two individuals in a business or social context. SECTION 2.  This act takes effect upon approval by the Governor. ----XX----